Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1370.11 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


For any county lodging tax levied pursuant to Section 1370.9 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes and any municipal lodging tax


levied upon the effective date of this act, the gross receipts or


gross proceeds upon which the tax is levied shall not include any


discounts or the provision of lodging or rooms at no charge to the


customer or employee when the seller receives no consideration or


reimbursement by a third party.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.




60-1-1366 QD 1/16/2025 3:44:16 PM



Req. No. 1366 Page 1